ro-RO: Posibilitatea de reglare a rezistenței: Ajustabilă; Fixă; Altele
cs: Nastavitelnost odporu: Nastavitelná; Pevná; Jiná
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh điện trở: Có thể điều chỉnh; Cố định; Khác
sl-SI: Nastavljivost upora: Nastavljivo; Fiksno; Drugo
pt-PT: Ajustabilidade da resistência: Ajustável; Fixa; Outra
fr: Réglage de la résistance: Réglable; Fixe; Autre
pt-BR: Resistência ajuste: Ajustável; Fixo; Outro
ru: Регулируемость сопротивления: Регулируемое; Фиксированное; Другое
nb: Motstandsjustering: Justerbar; Fast; Annet
nl: Weerstand verstelbaarheid: Verstelbaar; Vast; Overig
en: Resistance adjustability: Adjustable; Fixed; Other
sk-SK: Nastaviteľnosť odporu: Nastaviteľná; Pevná; Iné
pl: Możliwość regulacji oporu: Regulowany; Stały; Inne
zh-CN: 阻力可调节性: 可调节; 固定; 其他
hr-HR: Podesivost otpora: Podesivo; Fiksno; Ostalo
lt-LT: Pasipriešinimo reguliuojamumas: Reguliuojamas; Fiksuotas; Kita
sv: Motståndsjusterbarhet: Justerbar; Fast; Annat
hu: Ellenállás állíthatósága: Állítható; Fix; Egyéb
ko: 저항 조절 가능 여부: 조절 가능; 고정형; 기타
ja: 抵抗調整機能: 調節可能; 固定; その他
da: Modstandsjusterbarhed: Justerbar; Fast; Andet
th: การปรับความต้านทาน: ปรับได้; คงที่; อื่นๆ
el: Δυνατότητα ρύθμισης αντίστασης: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Σταθερό; Άλλο
tr: Direnç ayarlanabilirliği: Ayarlanabilir; Sabit; Diğer
bg-BG: Регулиране на съпротивлението: Регулируемо; Фиксирано; Други
de: Widerstandseinstellbarkeit: Verstellbar; Fest; Sonstiges
fi: Vastuksen säätö: Säädettävä; Kiinteä; Muu
es: Capacidad de ajuste de resistencia: Ajustable; Fijo; Otro
zh-TW: 阻力可調性: 可調式; 固定式; 其他
it: Regolazione della resistenza: Regolabile; Fissa; Altro